Idaho, session 2025, H0248.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the programs listed in Nat-
ural Resources the following amounts to be expended according to the desig-
nated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY:
A. ADMINISTRATION AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $2,809,300 $1,804,400 $1,779,500 $6,393,200
Air Quality Permitting
Fund 229,200 49,100 19,400 297,700
Public Water System Supervision
Fund 295,800 69,600 69,000 434,400
Environmental Remediation (Box)
Fund 15,500 10,000 25,500
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 20,000 14,400 12,600 47,000
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 290,500 107,700 90,400 488,600
Idaho Underground Storage Tank Program
Fund 59,100 15,900 18,400 93,400
IPDES Program
Fund 233,900 50,500 58,100 342,500
Bunker Hill Trust
Fund 34,200 6,800 5,900 46,900
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 1,716,800 1,183,600 1,135,300 4,035,700
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 424,600 0 0 424,600
TOTAL $6,128,900 $3,312,000 $3,188,600 $12,629,500
B. AIR QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $5,021,900 $213,600 $5,235,500
Air Quality Permitting
Fund 1,509,000 59,700 1,568,700
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 441,600 393,000 $300,000 1,134,600


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 1,602,300 2,093,200 1,581,400 5,276,900
TOTAL $8,574,800 $2,759,500 $1,881,400 $13,215,700
C. WATER QUALITY:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $9,870,500 $1,719,600 $967,500 $12,557,600
Public Water System Supervision
Fund 1,505,100 499,700 2,004,800
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 735,000 993,700 2,521,600 4,250,300
IPDES Program
Fund 1,384,200 196,400 1,580,600
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 6,595,700 13,440,000 2,333,200 22,368,900
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 481,500 7,500 59,452,200 59,941,200
TOTAL $20,572,000 $16,856,900 $65,274,500 $102,703,400
D. COEUR D'ALENE BASIN COMMISSION:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $137,900 $10,200 $148,100
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 85,200 15,500 100,700
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 16,100 0 $50,000 66,100
TOTAL $239,200 $25,700 $50,000 $314,900
E. WASTE MANAGEMENT AND REMEDIATION:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $3,476,900 $156,200 $94,600 $3,727,700
Environmental Remediation (Box)
Fund 280,900 97,300 210,500 588,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Environmental Remediation (Basin)
Fund 390,800 58,500 280,000 729,300
Department of Environmental Quality (Receipts)
Fund 1,027,700 166,600 51,800 1,246,100
Idaho Underground Storage Tank Program
Fund 293,600 25,000 318,600
Bunker Hill Trust
Fund 109,100 4,390,000 375,000 4,874,100
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 3,566,700 8,242,900 2,500,500 14,310,100
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 1,047,600 8,432,800 4,000,000 13,480,400
TOTAL $10,193,300 $21,569,300 $7,512,400 $39,275,000
F. IDAHO NATIONAL LABORATORY OVERSIGHT:
FROM:
Department of Environmental Quality (General)
Fund $103,700 $8,700 $112,400
Department of Environmental Quality (Federal)
Fund 1,225,500 1,318,800 $146,900 2,691,200
TOTAL $1,329,200 $1,327,500 $146,900 $2,803,600
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $47,037,400 $45,850,900 $3,188,600 $74,865,200 $170,942,100
(2) DEPARTMENT OF FISH AND GAME:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $6,092,200 $5,144,300 $11,236,500
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 1,055,200 283,300 1,338,500
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 31,600 31,600
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 22,100 22,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Expendable Big Game Depredation
Fund 2,900 2,900
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 8,300 8,300
Fish and Game Nonexpendable Trust
Fund 3,600 3,600
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 4,508,600 5,398,700 9,907,300
TOTAL $11,656,000 $10,894,800 $22,550,800
B. ENFORCEMENT:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $13,296,300 $2,895,600 $16,191,900
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 182,400 77,000 259,400
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 20,600 20,600
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 26,400 26,400
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 2,300 6,700 9,000
TOTAL $13,481,000 $3,026,300 $16,507,300
C. FISHERIES:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $5,140,400 $7,621,400 $12,761,800
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 3,538,400 8,398,200 11,936,600
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 395,200 578,100 973,300
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 175,500 100,700 276,200
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 36,000 333,000 369,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Fish and Game Nonexpendable Trust
Fund 33,200 33,200
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 16,368,600 14,465,100 30,833,700
TOTAL $25,654,100 $31,529,700 $57,183,800
D. WILDLIFE:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $7,752,800 $6,555,600 $174,800 $14,483,200
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 497,000 986,700 1,483,700
Fish and Game Set-Aside
Fund 170,000 3,666,000 3,836,000
Fish and Game Set-Aside (Other)
Fund 714,300 325,300 1,039,600
Expendable Big Game Depredation
Fund 1,800,000 1,800,000
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 314,500 896,100 1,210,600
Fish and Game Nonexpendable Trust
Fund 11,500 2,300 13,800
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 8,657,600 10,272,700 0 18,930,300
TOTAL $18,117,700 $22,704,700 $1,974,800 $42,797,200
E. COMMUNICATIONS:
FROM:
Fish and Game
Fund $1,982,800 $704,800 $2,687,600
Fish and Game (Other)
Fund 49,600 35,700 85,300
Fish and Game Expendable Trust
Fund 30,300 89,000 119,300
Fish and Game (Federal)
Fund 1,875,700 518,600 2,394,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
TOTAL $3,938,400 $1,348,100 $5,286,500
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $72,847,200 $69,503,600 $1,974,800 $144,325,600
(3) BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS:
I. ENDOWMENT FUND INVESTMENT BOARD:
FROM:
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund $81,500 $14,500 $96,000
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 630,400 197,000 827,400
TOTAL $711,900 $211,500 $923,400
II. DEPARTMENT OF LANDS:
A. BUSINESS SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $494,600 $461,400 $956,000
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 163,600 128,900 292,500
Department of Lands
Fund 899,700 716,300 1,616,000
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 2,792,700 3,211,700 6,004,400
TOTAL $4,350,600 $4,518,300 $8,868,900
B. FOREST RESOURCES MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,245,600 $729,600 $20,000 $1,995,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 69,300 324,000 393,300
Department of Lands
Fund 1,611,900 906,000 2,517,900
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 382,500 82,600 465,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Community Forestry
Fund 20,000 20,000 40,000
Federal Grant
Fund 1,192,800 3,125,700 2,915,400 7,233,900
TOTAL $4,502,100 $5,187,900 $2,955,400 $12,645,400
C. TRUST LAND MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $151,400 $2,300 $153,700
Department of Lands
Fund 170,400 278,700 449,100
Navigable Waterways
Fund 6,000 6,000
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 16,378,900 13,811,700 $50,000 30,240,600
TOTAL $16,706,700 $14,092,700 $50,000 $30,849,400
D. FOREST AND RANGE FIRE PROTECTION:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,961,200 $634,500 $1,594,100 $7,189,800
Department of Lands
Fund 5,023,700 696,900 873,000 6,593,600
Endowment Earnings Administrative
Fund 57,500 57,500
Federal Grant
Fund 823,100 1,305,000 450,000 2,578,100
TOTAL $10,808,000 $2,636,400 $2,974,600 $16,419,000
E. SCALING PRACTICES:
FROM:
Department of Lands
Fund $261,300 $58,000 $319,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
F. MINERALS, PUBLIC TRUST, OIL AND GAS:
FROM:
General
Fund $878,300 $137,800 $1,016,100
Department of Lands
Fund 480,000 1,239,100 1,719,100
Oil and Gas Conservation
Fund 134,900 107,800 242,700
Navigable Waterways
Fund 920,800 105,200 1,026,000
Federal Grant
Fund 0 2,500,000 2,500,000
TOTAL $2,414,000 $4,089,900 $6,503,900
DIVISION
TOTAL $39,042,700 $30,583,200 $50,000 $5,930,000 $75,605,900
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $39,754,600 $30,794,700 $50,000 $5,930,000 $76,529,300
(4) DEPARTMENT OF PARKS AND RECREATION:
A. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $485,500 $473,700 $959,200
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 319,700 197,200 516,900
Parks and Recreation
Fund 1,759,000 2,051,700 $420,000 4,230,700
Recreational Fuels
Fund 418,100 558,900 2,971,800 3,948,800
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund 307,300 145,100 9,650,000 10,102,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 15,600 15,600
Federal Grant
Fund 0 2,600 3,000,000 3,002,600
TOTAL $3,289,600 $3,444,800 $16,041,800 $22,776,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. PARK OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,707,900 $588,700 $3,296,600
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 2,400 2,400
Parks and Recreation
Fund 9,592,900 3,198,300 12,791,200
Recreational Fuels
Fund 291,500 369,600 661,100
Parks and Recreation Registration
Fund 1,193,300 1,106,300 $700,000 2,999,600
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 19,600 76,500 96,100
Public Recreation Enterprise
Fund 890,900 1,429,000 2,319,900
Parks and Recreation Expendable Trust
Fund 602,800 405,600 1,008,400
Federal Grant
Fund 1,320,200 628,600 1,227,500 3,176,300
TOTAL $16,619,100 $7,805,000 $1,927,500 $26,351,600
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $19,908,700 $11,249,800 $17,969,300 $49,127,800
(5) DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES:
A. MANAGEMENT AND SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $948,900 $895,200 $1,844,100
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 191,000 195,900 386,900
Water Administration
Fund 21,100 21,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 171,200 171,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
TOTAL $1,139,900 $1,283,400 $2,423,300
B. PLANNING AND TECHNICAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,108,800 $706,700 $6,936,500 $11,752,000
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 58,300 58,300
Aquifer Planning and Management
Fund 1,232,900 457,400 1,690,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 164,500 164,500
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 50,000,000 50,000,000
Federal Grant
Fund 374,700 857,700 0 1,232,400
TOTAL $5,716,400 $2,244,600 $56,936,500 $64,897,500
C. WATER MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $7,130,400 $2,210,100 $9,340,500
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 67,500 67,500
Water Administration
Fund 1,711,300 235,000 1,946,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,106,600 320,200 1,426,800
Federal Grant
Fund 300,600 348,800 649,400
TOTAL $10,248,900 $3,181,600 $13,430,500
D. NORTHERN IDAHO ADJUDICATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $394,100 $190,200 $584,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Northern Idaho Adjudication
Fund 0 38,700 38,700
TOTAL $394,100 $228,900 $623,000
E. BEAR RIVER BASIN ADJUDICATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $726,200 $154,900 $881,100
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $18,225,500 $7,093,400 $56,936,500 $82,255,400
GRANDTOTAL $197,773,400 $164,492,400 $3,238,600 $157,675,800 $523,180,200
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in Natural Resources is authorized no more
than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any point
during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, unless specifically
authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Environmental Quality ..........................385.00
Department of Fish and Game ...................................550.00
Endowment Fund Investment Board ................................4.00
Department of Lands ..........................................332.60
Department of Parks and Recreation ............................190.80
Department of Water Resources ................................170.00
SECTION 3. REMEDIATION PROJECT REPORTING REQUIREMENTS. Moneys de-
posited into the Environmental Remediation (Basin) Fund shall be used for
remediation of the Coeur d'Alene Basin in accordance with the Superfund
contract with the Environmental Protection Agency. The Department of En-
vironmental Quality shall submit an annual report to the Governor, the
Legislature, and the Basin Environmental Improvement Project Commission on
the remediation progress and the expenditures involved.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER FOR WASTE REMEDIATION. There is hereby ap-
propriated to the Department of Environmental Quality and the Office of the
State Controller shall transfer $1,500,000 from the Water Pollution Control
Fund to the Environmental Remediation (Basin) Fund on July 1, 2025, or as
soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026, to be used for Superfund cleanup projects in the Coeur d'Alene Basin.


SECTION 5. CASH TRANSFER FOR AGRICULTURAL BEST MANAGEMENT PRACTICES.
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Environmental Quality and
the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $279,000 from the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality (General) Fund to the Agricultural Best Man-
agement Practices (BMP) Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as prac-
ticable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 6. USES OF THE WATER POLLUTION CONTROL FUND. The appropriation
of moneys from the Water Pollution Control Fund in this act for the Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality shall specifically supersede the provisions
of Section 39-3630, Idaho Code.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RECOV-
ERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Environmen-
tal Quality any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated to the De-
partment of Environmental Quality from the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund
for water infrastructure and remediation projects for fiscal year 2025 from
the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expendi-
tures related to water infrastructure and remediation projects for the pe-
riod of July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. USES OF ARPA STATE FISCAL RECOVERY FUND. It is the intent of
the Legislature to provide no more than $325,000,000 of American Rescue Plan
Act (ARPA) funding to support construction of drinking water and wastewater
projects. Moneys shall be appropriated from the ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund for this purpose. The Department of Environmental Quality may use the
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery Fund to fund all eligible planning grant requests
received consistent with existing processes. The Department of Environmen-
tal Quality shall provide ARPA funding in the form of grants for construction
of drinking water and wastewater projects using a tiered approach that pro-
vides the highest level of grant funding to systems with the greatest level
of need but least ability to pay, as determined by factors including size of
system (smaller systems rank higher), monthly user rates, median income, and
readiness to proceed. The Department of Environmental Quality may consider
all projects meeting the intended criteria where costs were incurred after
March 3, 2021, and where construction will be completed prior to December
31, 2026. This includes funding cost overruns for existing state revolving
loan-funded projects currently under construction if they are due to factors
such as increased labor and material costs. The Department of Environmental
Quality shall provide a written update of recipients to germane legislative
committees upon approval by the Board of Environmental Quality. The Depart-
ment of Environmental Quality shall submit a report to the Governor and the
Legislature detailing progress and expenditures by January 12, 2026.
SECTION 9. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION. The Endowment Fund Investment
Board is hereby granted continuous appropriation authority for consulting


fees, custodial fees, investment manager fees, and other portfolio-related
external costs for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 10. TRANSFERS FROM EARNINGS RESERVE FUNDS. For fiscal year
2026, it is hereby appropriated and the Endowment Fund Investment Board
shall transfer $110,371,200 as follows: $68,224,800 from the Public School
Earnings Reserve Fund to the Public School Income Fund; $2,102,400 from
the Agricultural College Earnings Reserve Fund to the Agricultural College
Endowment Income Fund; $7,502,400 from the Charitable Institutions Earn-
ings Reserve Fund to the Charitable Institutions Endowment Income Fund;
$7,783,200 from the Normal School Earnings Reserve Fund to the Normal School
Endowment Income Fund; $3,322,800 from the Penitentiary Earnings Reserve
Fund to the Penitentiary Endowment Income Fund; $7,084,800 from the Scien-
tific School Earnings Reserve Fund to the Scientific School Endowment Income
Fund; $7,776,000 from the Mental Hospital Earnings Reserve Fund to the
Mental Hospital Endowment Income Fund; and $6,574,800 from the University
Earnings Reserve Fund to the University Endowment Income Fund.
SECTION 11. EXEMPTIONS FROM EXPENSE CLASS TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The
Department of Lands is hereby exempted from the provisions of Section
67-3511(1) and (3), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers between ex-
pense classes for all moneys appropriated to the Forest and Range Fire
Protection Program for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. Leg-
islative appropriations shall not be transferred from one fund to another
fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 12. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE CAPITAL DEVELOPMENT PRO-
GRAM. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Parks and Recre-
ation any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropri-
ated to the Department of Parks and Recreation for the Capital Development
Program for fiscal year 2025 to be used for nonrecurring expenditures in the
Capital Development Program for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 13. CASH TRANSFER FOR AQUIFER MANAGEMENT. Of the amount appro-
priated to the Department of Water Resources in Section 1 of this act for the
Planning and Technical Services Program from the General Fund, the Office
of the State Controller shall transfer $5,000,000 to the Secondary Aquifer
Planning, Management, and Implementation Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon
thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026,
to be used for aquifer recharge and management.
SECTION 14. CASH TRANSFER FOR THE FLOOD MANAGEMENT PROGRAM. Of the
amount appropriated to the Department of Water Resources in Section 1 of this
act for the Planning and Technical Services Program from the General Fund,
the Office of the State Controller shall transfer $1,000,000 to the Water
Management Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practicable for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, to be used for hydrologic


data collection, monitoring and modeling, flood-damaged stream channel
repair, stream channel improvement, flood risk reduction, or flood pre-
vention projects. These moneys shall be administered by the Idaho Water
Resource Board through a competitive, matching grant process that priori-
tizes projects based on the public benefits they provide.
SECTION 15. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 16. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 17. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.